src/ruleset/rules_phase4.foma
#This does section 3.8, the transformation of vowels to sounds
#This is huge, so it's in it's own file

#Jose identifies a very useful rule, which is that a group of annotated vowels is equivalent to
#the annotated first vowel with the remaining crossed out
define EliminateAntDiphthongs \"}"* -> 0 || VowelAnt "{" ? _ "}";

#With this done, we need to go through tables 4, 5, 6, 7 and start making IPA transcriptions

#First: Non-annotated, unstressed, single vowels
define SB8 ["-"|.#.];
define UB8 [SB8 | "#" | ",#" | "@" | ",@"];
define CM8 ["#"|",#"] [":"|"|"];
define VM8 ["@"|",@"] ["'"|"''"|"_"] ["*"|"&"|"%"] ["!"|"+"];

#DIY vowel unit construction
define VS ["@"|",@"];
define ST ["'"|"''"];
define NST "_";
define AST [ST | NST];
define NAT "*";
define PLN "&";
define ATN [NAT | PLN | "%"];
define RH "!";
define NRH "+";
define ARH [RH | NRH];

define NAUSSL VS NST ATN ARH;

define NonRhoticL VS AST ATN NRH;
define RhoticL VS AST ATN RH;
define NatNonRhoticL VS AST NAT NRH;
define NatRhoticL VS AST NAT RH;
define PlnNonRhoticL VS AST PLN NRH;
define PlnRhoticL VS AST PLN RH;
define StNonRhoticL VS ST ATN NRH;
define NoStNonRhoticL VS NST ATN NRH;
define StRhoticL VS ST ATN RH;
define NoStRhoticL VS NST ATN RH;

define IPAVowel 
                #Start with unstressed, unannotated
                "a" -> "ə" || NAUSSL _  UB8 ,,
                "e" -> 0 || NAUSSL _ SB8 ,,
                "e" -> 0 || NAUSSL _ CM8 AnyAnt(["d"|"s"]) ,,
                "e" -> "ə" || NAUSSL _ [? - ",#" - "#" - "-" - .#.] ,,
                "e" -> "ə" || NAUSSL _ CM8 Ant "{" [\"d"  & \"s"] ,,
                "e" -> "ə" || NAUSSL _ CM8 [\Ant & \"d" & \"s"] ,,
#"e" -> "ə" || NAUSSL _ [?+ - SB8 - [CM8 AnyAnt(["d"|"s"])]] ,,
                ["i"|"y"] -> "i" || NAUSSL _ UB8 ,,
                "o" -> "o" "ʊ" || NAUSSL _ SB8 ,,
                "o" -> "o" "ʊ" || NAUSSL _ CM8 AnyAnt("s") ,,
                "o" -> "o" "ʊ" || NAUSSL _ VM8 AnyAnt("e") CM8 AnyAnt("s") ,,
                "o" -> "ə" || NAUSSL _ CM8 (Ant "{") \"s" ,,
                "o" -> "ə" || NAUSSL _ VM8 (Ant "{") \"e" ,,
                "o" -> "ə" || NAUSSL _ VM8 AnyAnt("e") \[",#"|"#"] ,,
                "o" -> "ə" || NAUSSL _ VM8 AnyAnt("e") CM8 \AnyAnt("s") ,,
                "u" -> "ə" || NAUSSL _ UB8 ,,
                
                #Now we copnsider stressed or annotated words
                WithAnt("\nat", "a") -> "e" "ɪ" || NonRhoticL  _ ,,
                WithAnt("\nat", "a") -> "ɛ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                "a" -> "e" "ɪ" || NatNonRhoticL _ UB8,,
                "a" -> "ɛ" "ʁ" || NatRhoticL _ UB8,,
                WithAnt("\nat", "e") -> "i" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\nat", "e") -> "ɪ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                "e" -> "i" "ː" || NatNonRhoticL _ UB8,,
                "e" -> "ɪ" "ʁ" || NatRhoticL _ UB8,,
                WithAnt("\nat", ["i"|"y"]) -> "a" "ɪ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\nat", ["i"|"y"]) -> "a" "ɪ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
#CHANGE: aI -> lambda-I
                ["i"|"y"] -> "ʌ" "ɪ" || NatNonRhoticL _ UB8,,
                ["i"|"y"] -> "ʌ" "ɪ" "ʁ" || NatRhoticL _ UB8,,
                WithAnt("\nat", "o") -> "o" "ʊ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\nat", "o") -> "ɔ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                "o" -> "o" "ʊ" || NatNonRhoticL _ UB8,,
                "o" -> "ɔ" "ɹ" || NatRhoticL _ UB8 ,,
                WithAnt("\nat", ["u"|"w"]) -> "j" "u" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\nat", ["u"|"w"]) -> "j" "ʊ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                ["u"|"w"] -> "j" "u" "ː" || NatNonRhoticL _ UB8 ,,
                ["u"|"w"] -> "j" "ʊ" "ʁ" || NatRhoticL _ UB8 ,,
                #plain
                WithAnt("\pln", "a") -> "æ" || NonRhoticL  _ ,,
                WithAnt("\pln", "a") -> "ɑ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                "a" -> "æ" || PlnNonRhoticL _ UB8 ,,
                "a" -> "ɑ" "ɹ" || PlnRhoticL _ UB8 ,,
                WithAnt("\pln", "e") -> "ɛ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\pln", "e") -> "ɜ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                "e" -> "ɛ" || PlnNonRhoticL _ UB8 ,,
                "e" -> "ɜ" "ɹ" || PlnRhoticL _ UB8 ,,
                WithAnt("\pln", ["i"|"y"]) -> "ɪ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\pln", ["i"|"y"]) -> "ɜ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                ["i"|"y"] -> "ɪ" || PlnNonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\pln", "o") -> "o" "ʊ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\pln", "o") -> "ɔ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                "o" -> "ɒ" || PlnNonRhoticL _ UB8 ,,
                "o" -> "ɔ" "ɹ" || PlnRhoticL _ UB8 ,,
                WithAnt("\pln", ["u"|"w"]) -> "ʌ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\pln", ["u"|"w"]) -> "ɜ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                ["u"|"w"] -> "ʌ" || PlnNonRhoticL _ UB8 ,,
                ["u"|"w"] -> "ɜ" "ɹ" || PlnRhoticL _ UB8 ,,
                #Broad
                WithAnt("\brd", "a") -> "ɑ" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\brd", "a") -> "ɑ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\brd", "e") -> "e" "ɪ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\brd", "e") -> "ɜ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\brd", ["i"|"y"]) -> "i" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\brd", ["i"|"y"]) -> "i" "ː" || RhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\brd", "o") -> "ɔ" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\brd", "o") -> "ɔ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\brd", ["u"|"w"]) -> "u" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\brd", ["u"|"w"]) -> "ʊ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                #i-diphthong
                WithAnt("\idp", ["a"|"e"]) -> "a" "ɪ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\idp", ["a"|"e"]) -> "a" "ɪ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\idp", "o") -> "w" "a" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\idp", "o") -> "w" "a" "ː" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\idp", "u") -> "j" "ə" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\idp", "u") -> "j" "ə" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                #u-diphthong
                WithAnt("\udp", ["a"|"o"]) -> "a" "ʊ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\udp", ["a"|"o"]) -> "a" "ʊ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\udp", "e") -> "ɔ" "ɪ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\udp", "e") -> "ɔ" "ɪ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\udp", "u") -> "j" "ʊ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\udp", "u") -> "j" "ʊ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                #Clear
                WithAnt("\clr", ["a"|"o"]) -> "ʌ" || VM8 _ ,,
                WithAnt("\clr", "e") -> "æ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\clr", "e") -> "ɑ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\clr", "i") -> "æ" || VM8 _ ,,
                #Central
                WithAnt("\ctr", ["a"|"u"]) -> "ɛ" || VM8 _ ,,
                WithAnt("\ctr", "e") -> "ə" || VM8 _ ,,
                WithAnt("\ctr", "i") -> "ə" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\ctr", "o") -> "ɜ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\ctr", ["i"|"o"]) -> "ə" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                #Ioted
                WithAnt("\iot", ?) -> "ɪ" || VM8 _ ,,
                #Rounded
                WithAnt("\rnd", "a") -> "ɔ" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\rnd", "a") -> "ɔ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\rnd", "e") -> "o" "ʊ" || VM8 _ ,,
                WithAnt("\rnd", "o") -> "u" "ː" || VM8 _ ,,
                WithAnt("\rnd", "u") -> "o" "ʊ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\rnd", "u") -> "ɔ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                #Opaque
                WithAnt("\opq", ["a"|"e"|"i"]) -> "ɔ" || VM8 _ ,,
                WithAnt("\opq", "o") -> "ʊ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\opq", "o") -> "ʊ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                WithAnt("\opq", "u") -> "ʊ" || VM8 _ ,,

                #And do dipthongs
                "a" "a" -> "ɑ" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                "a" "a" -> "ɑ" "ː" || RhoticL ,,
                ["a" "e" | "e" "e"] -> "i" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                ["a" "e" | "e" "e"] -> "ɪ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                "e" "a" -> "i" "ː" || StNonRhoticL _ ,,
                "e" "a" -> "ɪ" "ʁ" || StRhoticL _ ,,
                "e" "a" -> "ɪ" "ə" || NoStNonRhoticL _ ,,
                "e" "a" -> "ɪ" "ə" "ɹ" || NoStRhoticL _ ,,
                ["a" "i" | "a" "y"] -> "e" "ɪ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                ["a" "i" | "a" "y"] -> "ɛ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                ["e" "i" | "e" "y"] -> "e" "ɪ" || StNonRhoticL _ ,,
                ["e" "i" | "e" "y"] -> "ɛ" "ʁ" || StRhoticL _ ,,
                ["e" "i" | "e" "y"] -> "ɪ" || NoStNonRhoticL _ ,,
                ["e" "i" | "e" "y"] -> "ɛ" "ʁ" || NoStRhoticL _ ,,
                ["a" "u" | "a" "w"] -> "ɔ" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                ["a" "u" | "a" "w"] -> "ɔ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                ["e" "u" | "e" "w"] -> "j" "u" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                ["e" "u" | "e" "w"] -> "j" "ʊ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                ["o" "a" | "o" "w"] -> "o" "ʊ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                ["o" "a" | "o" "w"] -> "ɔ" "ɹ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                "o" "u" -> "a" "ʊ" || StNonRhoticL _ ,,
                "o" "u" -> "a" "ʊ" "ʁ" || StRhoticL _ ,,
                "o" "u" -> "ə" || NoStNonRhoticL _ ,,
                "o" "u" -> "ə" "ɹ" || NoStRhoticL _ ,,
                ["o" "i" | "o" "y"] -> "ɪ" "ɔ" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                ["o" "i" | "o" "y"] -> "ɪ" "ɔ" "ʁ" || RhoticL _ ,,
                "o" "o" -> "u" "ː" || NonRhoticL _ ,,
                "o" "o" -> "u" "ʁ" || RhoticL _;

#after having done this, we need to eilminate any now-empty vowel units
define EliminateEmptyVowels VM8 -> 0 || _ UB8;

define Phase38 EliminateAntDiphthongs .o. IPAVowel .o. EliminateEmptyVowels;
